Hawaii statutes.
§201-14 Consolidated film permit
processing. (a) The department shall consult with state and county
agencies in order to identify sites that can be used for making visually
recorded productions under terms and conditions as may be determined by the state
or county agency having jurisdiction over the sites.

(b) The department may accept an application
from any person who proposes to make a motion picture, television show,
television commercial, or other visually recorded production at one or more
sites on state or county lands, whether or not set aside under section 171-11.

(c) The applicant shall identify the sites to
be covered by the permit and provide other information as may be required by
the department.

(d) The department may approve and issue a
permit to film at any of the sites identified by the appropriate state or
county agency under subsection (a). If any site requested for use by the
applicant is not identified under subsection (a), the department shall consult
with the appropriate state or county agency having jurisdiction over the site
to obtain a permit. If the matter of a permit cannot be resolved in this
manner, the department shall refer the application to the appropriate state or
county agency to obtain a permit.

(e) The department is authorized to make
changes to, and extensions of, any approved permits so long as the changes and
extensions do not conflict with the policies, terms, and conditions set forth
by the agency having jurisdiction over the site in question.

(f) The department may establish memoranda of
agreement or adopt rules to implement the intent and purposes of this section.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed
as waiving the authority of any county or the department of transportation of
the State to require a person to obtain a permit from the department or county
where the production takes place on or from a public highway.

(h) A vessel engaged in temporary use for film
production purposes in accordance with a film permit issued by the department shall
not be considered to be a "commercial vessel" within the meaning of
section 200-9, 200-10, or 200-39; provided that:

(1) The period of temporary use does not exceed
fourteen hours per day, five days per week, excluding weekends, and for a
period not to exceed thirty calendar days; and

(2) The department may make allowances to include
weekends for film production purposes due to inclement weather conditions
during the weekday period. [L 1987, c 357, §1; am L 1997, c 298, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next